Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.067

Temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction—Contents—Notice—Noncompliance—Defense—Penalty.

(1) Any person having had actual notice of the existence of a restraining order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to RCW 26.44.063 who refuses to comply with the provisions of such order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) The notice requirements of subsection (1) of this section may be satisfied by the peace officer giving oral or written evidence to the person subject to the order by reading from or handing to that person a copy certified by a notary public or the clerk of the court to be an accurate copy of the original court order which is on file. The copy may be supplied by the court or any party.

(3) The remedies provided in this section shall not apply unless restraining orders subject to this section bear this legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.44 RCW AND IS ALSO SUBJECT TO CONTEMPT PROCEEDINGS.

(4) It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this section that the court order was issued contrary to law or court rule. No right of action shall accrue against any peace officer acting upon a properly certified copy of a court order lawful on its face if such officer employs otherwise lawful means to effect the arrest.

[ 2000 c 119 s 13; 1993 c 412 s 16; 1989 c 373 s 23; 1985 c 35 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—2000 c 119: See note following RCW 10.31.100.